Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB371.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of the act of October 6, 1998 (P.L.705, No.92), known as the Keystone Opportunity Zone, Keystone Opportunity Expansion Zone and Keystone Opportunity Improvement Zone Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Apprenticeship program." An apprenticeship training program that is approved by and registered with the Department of Labor and Industry under the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.604, No.304), known as The Apprenticeship and Training Act, and that provides for on-the-job training, classroom training and the graduation of apprentice trainees to journeyperson status. The term includes an apprenticeship program subject to ERISA or a non-ERISA program.* * *"ERISA program." A program under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 18 (relating to Employee Retirement Income Security Program).* * *"Skilled craft laborer." A member of a trade who meets any of the following criteria:(1) The individual is a worker who has work experience equivalent to the total number of on-the-job training hours required by the applicable apprenticeship program.(2) The individual g raduated from, or is currently enrolled in, an apprenticeship program.* * *Section 2. Section 307(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 307. Qualified businesses.(a) Qualifications.--In order to qualify each year for a tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act, a business shall own or lease real property in a subzone, improvement subzone or expansion subzone from which the business 20250HB0371PN0327 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 actively conducts a trade, profession or business. The qualified business shall receive certification from the department that the business is located and is in the active conduct of a trade, profession or business, within the subzone, improvement subzone or expansion subzone. The business shall obtain annual renewal of the certification from the department to continue to qualify under this section. The certification form shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:* * *(6) If applicable, the certified payrolls necessary to verify the requirements under subsection (c) in the manner customarily used by the United States Department of Labor to enforce 40 U.S.C. § 3145(a) (relating to regulations governing contractors and subcontractors).* * *(c) Capital investments.--(1) A business that makes a capital investment of more than $25,000 for the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of a facility on the parcel through which the business seeks a tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act shall verify with the department, in the following calendar or fiscal year, all of the following:(i) That 70% of the individuals employed by the business in construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of the facility are skilled craft laborers.(ii) That i ndividuals employed by the business or a contractor or subcontractor of the business for the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or 20250HB0371PN0327 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 repair of the facility have been paid the prevailing minimum wage rate for each craft or classification as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry under the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.(2) The Department of Labor and Industry shall enforce this subsection . The Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, 34 Pa. Code Ch. 9 Subch. E (relating to prevailing regulations) and 34 Pa. Code §§ 211.1 (relating to applicability of general rules) and 213.1 (relating to applicability of general rules) shall apply to any construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of a facility, other than maintenance work, that occurs due to a business entity making a capital investment of more than $25,000 for the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of that facility on the parcel through which the business entity seeks a tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under this act . (3) In addition to enforcement authorized under the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, and paragraph (2) , if, after notice and hearing, the Department of Labor and Industry determines that a business entity intentionally failed to pay or intentionally caused another person to fail to pay the prevailing wage or benefit rates as specified under section 11(h) of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act for the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of a facility in violation of this subsection , or ratified the intentional failure by a contractor or subcontractor of the business entity, the business entity shall refund 100% of the amount of the tax exemption, 20250HB0371PN0327 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deduction, abatement or credit awarded under this act for the fiscal year in which the intentional noncompliance occurred as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry.(4) A finding of a violation under paragraph (3) may be appealed under section 2.2(e)(1) of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act and 34 Pa. Code § 213.3 (relating to appeals from determinations of the Secretary). Any final determination by the Appeals Board under the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act may be appealed in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0371PN0327 - 5 - 1234567891011